Illinois, session 104th, SB3760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Construction Bond Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 550/1)  (from Ch. 29, par. 15)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-168)8    Sec. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this Act, until 9January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, all officials, boards, 10commissions, or agents of this State, or of any political 11subdivision thereof, other than a local governmental unit, in 12making contracts for public work of any kind costing over 13$150,000 to be performed for the State, or of any political 14subdivision thereof, other than a local governmental unit, 15shall require every contractor for the work to furnish, supply 16and deliver a bond to the State, or to the political 17subdivision thereof entering into the contract, as the case 18may be, with good and sufficient sureties. The surety on the 19bond shall be a company that is licensed by the Department of 20Insurance authorizing it to execute surety bonds and the 21company shall have a financial strength rating of at least A- 22as rated by A.M. Best Company, Inc., Moody's Investors 23Service, Standard & Poor's Corporation, or a similar rating   SB3760- 2 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1agency. The amount of the bond shall be fixed by the officials, 2boards, commissions, commissioners or agents, and the bond, 3among other conditions, shall be conditioned for the 4completion of the contract, for the payment of material, 5apparatus, fixtures, and machinery used in the work and for 6all labor performed in the work, whether by subcontractor or 7otherwise. 8    Until January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, when making 9contracts for public works to be constructed, the Department 10of Transportation and the Illinois State Toll Highway 11Authority shall require every contractor for those works to 12furnish, supply, and deliver a bond to the Department or the 13Authority, as the case may be, with good and sufficient 14sureties only if the public works contract will cost more than 15$10,000,000 $500,000. The Department of Transportation and the 16Illinois State Toll Highway Authority shall publicly display 17the following information by website or annual report and 18shall provide that information to interested parties upon 19request:20        (1) a list of each of its defaulted public works 21    contracts, including the value of the award, the adjusted 22    contract value, and the amount remaining unpaid by the 23    Department or Authority, as applicable;24        (2) the number and the aggregate amount of payment 25    claims made under the Mechanics Lien Act along with the 26    number of contracts in which payment claims are made under   SB3760- 3 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1    the Mechanics Lien Act;2        (3) for each of its public improvement contracts, 3    regardless of the contract value, the aggregate annual 4    revenue of the contractor derived from contracts with the 5    State; 6        (4) for each of its public works contracts, regardless 7    of contract value, the identity of the surety providing 8    the contract bond, payment and performance bond, or both; 9    and 10        (5) for each of its public works contracts, regardless 11    of the bond threshold, a list of bidders for each public 12    works contract, and the amount bid by each bidder. 13    Until January 1, 2034, all officials, boards, commissions, 14or agents of a local governmental unit, in making contracts 15for public work of any kind costing over $5,000,000 to be 16performed for the local governmental unit shall require every 17contractor for the work to furnish, supply, and deliver a bond 18to the local governmental unit with good and sufficient 19sureties. The surety on the bond shall be a company that is 20licensed by the Department of Insurance authorizing it to 21execute surety bonds and the company shall have a financial 22strength rating of at least A- as rated by A.M. Best Company, 23Inc., Moody's Investors Service, Standard & Poor's 24Corporation, or a similar rating agency. The amount of the 25bond shall be fixed by the officials, boards, commissions, 26commissioners, or agents, and the bond, among other   SB3760- 4 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1conditions, shall be conditioned for the completion of the 2contract, for the payment of material, apparatus, fixtures, 3and machinery used in the work and for all labor performed in 4the work, whether by subcontractor or otherwise. Until January 51, 2034, January 1, 2029, local governmental units may require 6a bond, by ordinance or resolution, for public works contracts 7valued at $5,000,000 $150,000 or less. 8    On and after January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, all 9officials, boards, commissions, or agents of this State, or of 10any political subdivision thereof, in making contracts for 11public work of any kind costing over $50,000 to be performed 12for the State, or of any political subdivision thereof, shall 13require every contractor for the work to furnish, supply and 14deliver a bond to the State, or to the political subdivision 15thereof entering into the contract, as the case may be, with 16good and sufficient sureties. The surety on the bond shall be a 17company that is licensed by the Department of Insurance 18authorizing it to execute surety bonds and the company shall 19have a financial strength rating of at least A- as rated by 20A.M. Best Company, Inc., Moody's Investors Service, Standard & 21Poor's Corporation, or a similar rating agency. The amount of 22the bond shall be fixed by the officials, boards, commissions, 23commissioners or agents, and the bond, among other conditions, 24shall be conditioned for the completion of the contract, for 25the payment of material, apparatus, fixtures, and machinery 26used in the work and for all labor performed in the work,   SB3760- 5 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1whether by subcontractor or otherwise. 2    If the contract is for emergency repairs as provided in 3the Illinois Procurement Code, proof of payment for all labor, 4materials, apparatus, fixtures, and machinery may be furnished 5in lieu of the bond required by this Section.6    Each such bond is deemed to contain the following 7provisions whether such provisions are inserted in such bond 8or not:9    "The principal and sureties on this bond agree that all 10the undertakings, covenants, terms, conditions and agreements 11of the contract or contracts entered into between the 12principal and the State or any political subdivision thereof 13will be performed and fulfilled and to pay all persons, firms 14and corporations having contracts with the principal or with 15subcontractors, all just claims due them under the provisions 16of such contracts for labor performed or materials furnished 17in the performance of the contract on account of which this 18bond is given, when such claims are not satisfied out of the 19contract price of the contract on account of which this bond is 20given, after final settlement between the officer, board, 21commission or agent of the State or of any political 22subdivision thereof and the principal has been made.". 23    Each bond securing contracts between the Capital 24Development Board or any board of a public institution of 25higher education and a contractor shall contain the following 26provisions, whether the provisions are inserted in the bond or   SB3760- 6 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1not: 2    "Upon the default of the principal with respect to 3undertakings, covenants, terms, conditions, and agreements, 4the termination of the contractor's right to proceed with the 5work, and written notice of that default and termination by 6the State or any political subdivision to the surety 7("Notice"), the surety shall promptly remedy the default by 8taking one of the following actions:9        (1) The surety shall complete the work pursuant to a 10    written takeover agreement, using a completing contractor 11    jointly selected by the surety and the State or any 12    political subdivision; or13        (2) The surety shall pay a sum of money to the obligee, 14    up to the penal sum of the bond, that represents the 15    reasonable cost to complete the work that exceeds the 16    unpaid balance of the contract sum.17    The surety shall respond to the Notice within 15 working 18days of receipt indicating the course of action that it 19intends to take or advising that it requires more time to 20investigate the default and select a course of action. If the 21surety requires more than 15 working days to investigate the 22default and select a course of action or if the surety elects 23to complete the work with a completing contractor that is not 24prepared to commence performance within 15 working days after 25receipt of Notice, and if the State or any political 26subdivision determines it is in the best interest of the State   SB3760- 7 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1to maintain the progress of the work, the State or any 2political subdivision may continue to work until the 3completing contractor is prepared to commence performance. 4Unless otherwise agreed to by the procuring agency, in no case 5may the surety take longer than 30 working days to advise the 6State or political subdivision on the course of action it 7intends to take. The surety shall be liable for reasonable 8costs incurred by the State or any political subdivision to 9maintain the progress to the extent the costs exceed the 10unpaid balance of the contract sum, subject to the penal sum of 11the bond.".12    The surety bond required by this Section may be acquired 13from the company, agent or broker of the contractor's choice. 14The bond and sureties shall be subject to the right of 15reasonable approval or disapproval, including suspension, by 16the State or political subdivision thereof concerned. Except 17as otherwise provided in this Section, in the case of State 18construction contracts, a contractor shall not be required to 19post a cash bond or letter of credit in addition to or as a 20substitute for the surety bond required by this Section.21    Prior to the completion of 50% of the contract for public 22works, a local governmental unit may not withhold retainage 23from any payment to a contractor who furnishes the bond or bond 24substitute required by this Act in an amount in excess of 10% 25of any payment made prior to the date of completion of 50% of 26the contract for public works. When a contract for public   SB3760- 8 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1works is 50% complete, the local governmental unit shall 2reduce the retainage so that no more than 5% is held. After the 3contract is 50% complete, no more than 5% of the amount of any 4subsequent payments made under the contract for public works 5may be withheld as retainage. 6    Prior to the completion of 50% of the contract for public 7works, the contractor and their respective subcontractors 8shall not withhold from their subcontractors retainage in 9excess of 10% of any payment made prior to the date of 10completion of 50% of the contract for public works. When the 11contract for public works is 50% complete, the contractor and 12its subcontractors shall reduce the retainage so that no more 13than 5% is withheld from their respective subcontractors. 14After the contract is 50% complete, the contractor and its 15subcontractors shall not withhold more than 5% of the amount 16of any subsequent payments made under the contract to their 17respective subcontractors. 18    When other than motor fuel tax funds, federal-aid funds, 19or other funds received from the State are used, a political 20subdivision may allow the contractor to provide a 21non-diminishing irrevocable bank letter of credit, in lieu of 22the bond required by this Section, on contracts under $100,000 23to comply with the requirements of this Section. Any such bank 24letter of credit shall contain all provisions required for 25bonds by this Section.26    In order to reduce barriers to entry for diverse and small   SB3760- 9 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1businesses, the Department of Transportation may implement a 25-year pilot program to allow a contractor to provide a 3non-diminishing irrevocable bank letter of credit in lieu of 4the bond required by this Section on contracts under $500,000. 5Projects selected by the Department of Transportation for this 6pilot program must be classified by the Department as low-risk 7scope of work contracts. The Department shall adopt rules to 8define the criteria for pilot project selection and 9implementation of the pilot program. 10    In this Section:11    "Local governmental unit" has the meaning ascribed to it 12in Section 2 of the Local Government Prompt Payment Act. 13    "Material", "labor", "apparatus", "fixtures", and 14"machinery" include those rented items that are on the 15construction site and those rented tools that are used or 16consumed on the construction site in the performance of the 17contract on account of which the bond is given. 18(Source: P.A. 102-968, eff. 1-1-23; 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-168)20    Sec. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this Act, until 21January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, all officials, boards, 22commissions, or agents of this State, or of any political 23subdivision thereof, other than a local governmental unit, in 24making contracts for public work of any kind costing over 25$150,000 to be performed for the State, or of any political   SB3760- 10 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1subdivision thereof, other than a local governmental unit, 2shall require every contractor for the work to furnish, supply 3and deliver a bond to the State, or to the political 4subdivision thereof entering into the contract, as the case 5may be, with good and sufficient sureties. The surety on the 6bond shall be a company that is licensed by the Department of 7Insurance authorizing it to execute surety bonds and the 8company shall have a financial strength rating of at least A- 9as rated by A.M. Best Company, Inc., Moody's Investors 10Service, Standard & Poor's Corporation, or a similar rating 11agency. The amount of the bond shall be fixed by the officials, 12boards, commissions, commissioners or agents, and the bond, 13among other conditions, shall be conditioned for the 14completion of the contract, for the payment of material, 15apparatus, fixtures, and machinery used in the work and for 16all labor performed in the work, whether by subcontractor or 17otherwise. 18    Until January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, when making 19contracts for public works to be constructed, the Department 20of Transportation and the Illinois State Toll Highway 21Authority shall require every contractor for those works to 22furnish, supply, and deliver a bond to the Department or the 23Authority, as the case may be, with good and sufficient 24sureties only if the public works contract will cost more than 25$10,000,000 $500,000. The Department of Transportation and the 26Illinois State Toll Highway Authority shall publicly display   SB3760- 11 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1the following information by website or annual report and 2shall provide that information to interested parties upon 3request:4        (1) a list of each of its defaulted public works 5    contracts, including the value of the award, the adjusted 6    contract value, and the amount remaining unpaid by the 7    Department or Authority, as applicable;8        (2) the number and the aggregate amount of payment 9    claims made under the Mechanics Lien Act along with the 10    number of contracts in which payment claims are made under 11    the Mechanics Lien Act;12        (3) for each of its public improvement contracts, 13    regardless of the contract value, the aggregate annual 14    revenue of the contractor derived from contracts with the 15    State; 16        (4) for each of its public works contracts, regardless 17    of contract value, the identity of the surety providing 18    the contract bond, payment and performance bond, or both; 19    and 20        (5) for each of its public works contracts, regardless 21    of the bond threshold, a list of bidders for each public 22    works contract, and the amount bid by each bidder. 23    Until January 1, 2034, all officials, boards, commissions, 24or agents of a local governmental unit, in making contracts 25for public work of any kind costing over $5,000,000 to be 26performed for the local governmental unit shall require every   SB3760- 12 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1contractor for the work to furnish, supply, and deliver a bond 2to the local governmental unit with good and sufficient 3sureties. The surety on the bond shall be a company that is 4licensed by the Department of Insurance authorizing it to 5execute surety bonds and the company shall have a financial 6strength rating of at least A- as rated by A.M. Best Company, 7Inc., Moody's Investors Service, Standard & Poor's 8Corporation, or a similar rating agency. The amount of the 9bond shall be fixed by the officials, boards, commissions, 10commissioners, or agents, and the bond, among other 11conditions, shall be conditioned for the completion of the 12contract, for the payment of material, apparatus, fixtures, 13and machinery used in the work and for all labor performed in 14the work, whether by subcontractor or otherwise. Until January 151, 2034, January 1, 2029, local governmental units may require 16a bond, by ordinance or resolution, for public works contracts 17valued at $5,000,000 $150,000 or less. 18    On and after January 1, 2034, January 1, 2029, all 19officials, boards, commissions, or agents of this State, or of 20any political subdivision thereof, in making contracts for 21public work of any kind costing over $50,000 to be performed 22for the State, or of any political subdivision thereof, shall 23require every contractor for the work to furnish, supply and 24deliver a bond to the State, or to the political subdivision 25thereof entering into the contract, as the case may be, with 26good and sufficient sureties. The surety on the bond shall be a   SB3760- 13 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1company that is licensed by the Department of Insurance 2authorizing it to execute surety bonds and the company shall 3have a financial strength rating of at least A- as rated by 4A.M. Best Company, Inc., Moody's Investors Service, Standard & 5Poor's Corporation, or a similar rating agency. The amount of 6the bond shall be fixed by the officials, boards, commissions, 7commissioners or agents, and the bond, among other conditions, 8shall be conditioned for the completion of the contract, for 9the payment of material, apparatus, fixtures, and machinery 10used in the work and for all labor performed in the work, 11whether by subcontractor or otherwise. 12    If the contract is for emergency repairs as provided in 13the Illinois Procurement Code, proof of payment for all labor, 14materials, apparatus, fixtures, and machinery may be furnished 15in lieu of the bond required by this Section.16    Each such bond is deemed to contain the following 17provisions whether such provisions are inserted in such bond 18or not:19    "The principal and sureties on this bond agree that all 20the undertakings, covenants, terms, conditions and agreements 21of the contract or contracts entered into between the 22principal and the State or any political subdivision thereof 23will be performed and fulfilled and to pay all persons, firms 24and corporations having contracts with the principal or with 25subcontractors, all just claims due them under the provisions 26of such contracts for labor performed or materials furnished   SB3760- 14 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1in the performance of the contract on account of which this 2bond is given, when such claims are not satisfied out of the 3contract price of the contract on account of which this bond is 4given, after final settlement between the officer, board, 5commission or agent of the State or of any political 6subdivision thereof and the principal has been made.". 7    Each bond securing contracts between the Capital 8Development Board or any board of a public institution of 9higher education and a contractor shall contain the following 10provisions, whether the provisions are inserted in the bond or 11not: 12    "Upon the default of the principal with respect to 13undertakings, covenants, terms, conditions, and agreements, 14the termination of the contractor's right to proceed with the 15work, and written notice of that default and termination by 16the State or any political subdivision to the surety 17("Notice"), the surety shall promptly remedy the default by 18taking one of the following actions:19        (1) The surety shall complete the work pursuant to a 20    written takeover agreement, using a completing contractor 21    jointly selected by the surety and the State or any 22    political subdivision; or23        (2) The surety shall pay a sum of money to the obligee, 24    up to the penal sum of the bond, that represents the 25    reasonable cost to complete the work that exceeds the 26    unpaid balance of the contract sum.  SB3760- 15 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1    The surety shall respond to the Notice within 15 working 2days of receipt indicating the course of action that it 3intends to take or advising that it requires more time to 4investigate the default and select a course of action. If the 5surety requires more than 15 working days to investigate the 6default and select a course of action or if the surety elects 7to complete the work with a completing contractor that is not 8prepared to commence performance within 15 working days after 9receipt of Notice, and if the State or any political 10subdivision determines it is in the best interest of the State 11to maintain the progress of the work, the State or any 12political subdivision may continue to work until the 13completing contractor is prepared to commence performance. 14Unless otherwise agreed to by the procuring agency, in no case 15may the surety take longer than 30 working days to advise the 16State or political subdivision on the course of action it 17intends to take. The surety shall be liable for reasonable 18costs incurred by the State or any political subdivision to 19maintain the progress to the extent the costs exceed the 20unpaid balance of the contract sum, subject to the penal sum of 21the bond.".22    The surety bond required by this Section may be acquired 23from the company, agent or broker of the contractor's choice. 24The bond and sureties shall be subject to the right of 25reasonable approval or disapproval, including suspension, by 26the State or political subdivision thereof concerned. Except   SB3760- 16 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1as otherwise provided in this Section, in the case of State 2construction contracts, a contractor shall not be required to 3post a cash bond or letter of credit in addition to or as a 4substitute for the surety bond required by this Section.5    Prior to the completion of 50% of the contract for public 6works, the State or a local governmental unit, except for the 7Department of Transportation, may not withhold retainage from 8any payment to a contractor who furnishes the bond or bond 9substitute required by this Act in an amount in excess of 10% 10of any payment made prior to the date of completion of 50% of 11the contract for public works. When a contract for public 12works is 50% complete, the State or the local governmental 13unit, except for the Department of Transportation, shall 14reduce the retainage so that no more than 5% is held. After the 15contract is 50% complete, no more than 5% of the amount of any 16subsequent payments made under the contract for public works 17may be withheld as retainage. 18    Subject to the limitations in this Section, a State agency 19may withhold as retainage a portion of the moneys from the 20payment of a contract that is entered into on or after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly if and only if the State agency determines that 23satisfactory progress has not been achieved by a contractor or 24subcontractor during any period for which a payment is to be 25made. Satisfactory progress shall be clearly provided for in 26the contract between the State agency and the contractor or   SB3760- 17 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1subcontractor. Retainage may not be used as a substitute for 2good contract management, and the State agency may not 3withhold funds without cause. Determinations to retain and the 4specific amount to be withheld must be made by the State agency 5on a case-by-case basis based on the performance of milestones 6under the current contract as provided for in the contract 7between the State agency and the contractor. A contractor may 8not withhold retainage from a subcontractor except to the 9extent a State agency has withheld retainage from the 10contractor which is attributable to that subcontractor's 11subcontract. This paragraph does not apply to the Illinois 12State Toll Highway Authority. 13    Prior to the completion of 50% of the contract for public 14works, the contractor and their respective subcontractors 15shall not withhold from their subcontractors retainage in 16excess of 10% of any payment made prior to the date of 17completion of 50% of the contract for public works. When the 18contract for public works is 50% complete, the contractor and 19its subcontractors shall reduce the retainage so that no more 20than 5% is withheld from their respective subcontractors. 21After the contract is 50% complete, the contractor and its 22subcontractors shall not withhold more than 5% of the amount 23of any subsequent payments made under the contract to their 24respective subcontractors. 25    When other than motor fuel tax funds, federal-aid funds, 26or other funds received from the State are used, a political   SB3760- 18 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1subdivision may allow the contractor to provide a 2non-diminishing irrevocable bank letter of credit, in lieu of 3the bond required by this Section, on contracts under $100,000 4to comply with the requirements of this Section. Any such bank 5letter of credit shall contain all provisions required for 6bonds by this Section.7    In order to reduce barriers to entry for diverse and small 8businesses, the Department of Transportation may implement a 95-year pilot program to allow a contractor to provide a 10non-diminishing irrevocable bank letter of credit in lieu of 11the bond required by this Section on contracts under $500,000. 12Projects selected by the Department of Transportation for this 13pilot program must be classified by the Department as low-risk 14scope of work contracts. The Department shall adopt rules to 15define the criteria for pilot project selection and 16implementation of the pilot program. 17    In this Section:18    "Local governmental unit" has the meaning ascribed to it 19in Section 2 of the Local Government Prompt Payment Act. 20    "Material", "labor", "apparatus", "fixtures", and 21"machinery" include those rented items that are on the 22construction site and those rented tools that are used or 23consumed on the construction site in the performance of the 24contract on account of which the bond is given. 25    "Retainage" means a portion of money withheld from a 26payment, including, but not limited to, a payment as defined   SB3760- 19 -LRB104 16548 HLH 29946 b1in the Local Government Prompt Payment Act or the State Prompt 2Payment Act, made to a contractor or subcontractor intended to 3ensure that the contractor or subcontractor completes the 4requirements of the contract or subcontract. "Retainage" does 5not include (i) moneys withheld due to violations of local, 6State, or federal laws or (ii) moneys withheld from grants to 7entities for capital improvements to non-State property. 8    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly may be construed to modify any provision of the State 10Prompt Payment Act or the Local Government Prompt Payment Act. 11(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 104-168, eff. 6-1-27.) 12    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 13changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 14that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 15represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 16not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 17made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 18Public Act.